Tennessee, session 114, HB2079.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 39, Chapter 14, Part 1, is amended by
adding the following new section:
(a) A person commits an offense who engages in conduct intended to influence
the outcome of an event while the person or another is a party to a contract with a
prediction-market by which the person will benefit, directly or indirectly, from the
occurrence of the outcome.
(b) A violation of subsection (a) is a Class E felony.
(c) As used in this section, "prediction-market" means a platform on which
individuals trade contracts based on the outcome of unknown future events.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2079
011239
- 1 -